Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.330

Scale weight tickets not precluded.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prevent the issuance of scale weight tickets showing when and what quantities of commodities were received and the condition thereof upon delivery.

[ 1983 c 305 s 45; 1963 c 124 s 33.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.